Utah statutes.
53A-1a-1006.   Audit and evaluation.
(1)  The state auditor shall:
(a)  conduct an annual audit of the contractor's use of funds for UPSTART; or
(b)  contract with an independent certified public accountant to conduct an
annual audit.
(2)  The State Board of Education shall:
(a)  require by contract that the contractor will open its books and records
relating to its expenditure of funds pursuant to the contract to the state
auditor or the state auditor's designee;
(b)  reimburse the state auditor for the actual and necessary costs of the
audit; and
(c)  contract with an independent, qualified evaluator, selected through a
request for proposals process, to evaluate the home-based educational
technology program for preschool children.
(3)  Of the money appropriated by the Legislature for UPSTART, excluding funds
used to provide computers, peripheral equipment, and Internet service to
families, no more than 7.5% may be used for the evaluation of the program.
